Wyoming, session 2026, SF0074.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-7-356 by creating new subsections
(g) through (k) are amended to read:

35-7-356. Registration.

(g) To protect the supply chain for critical
agricultural products and to ensure uniformity in pesticide
labeling and warnings within this state, it is the policy
SF0074

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0401
of this state to comply with the decisions of the United
States environmental protection agency regarding
registrations and renewals related to pesticide health and
safety warning labels in this state, notwithstanding any
state law to the contrary.

(h) Health and safety labels on any pesticide that is
sold in this state shall not vary in material respects from
the label that is registered with the United States
environmental protection agency at the time of sale of the
pesticide.

(j) This section shall supersede any common law
requirements relating to pesticide labels or warnings.

(k) Nothing in subsection (g) or (h) of this section
shall limit or change the state's authority to regulate the
use, distribution or sale of pesticides as set forth in
this article or as set forth in title 11, chapter 5 of the
Wyoming statutes.

SF0074

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0401
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0074